Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 46. Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act

§ 69-46-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 53, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 69-46-3.
Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Board; creation; purpose; composition; meetings.

There is created the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Board, hereinafter referred to as “the board,” for the purpose of assisting Mississippi agricultural industry in the development, marketing and distribution of agricultural products.

The board shall be composed of the following members:

The Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee, or a member of the Senate Agriculture Committee designated by the chairman, as a nonvoting member;

The Chairman of the House of Representatives Agriculture Committee or a member of the House of Representatives Agriculture Committee designated by the chairman, as a nonvoting member;

The Chairman of the Senate Forestry Committee, or a member of the Senate Forestry Committee designated by the chairman, as a nonvoting member;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority, or his designee;

The Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, or his designee;

The President of the Mississippi Farm Bureau Federation, or his designee;

The Director of the Cooperative Extension Service at Mississippi State University, or his designee;

The Executive Director of the Agribusiness and Natural Resource Development Center at Alcorn State University, or his designee;

The Director of the Agricultural Finance Division of the Mississippi Development Authority, or his designee;

The Director of the Agriculture Marketing Division of the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, or his designee;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Forestry Commission, or his designee; and

Three (3) individuals appointed by the Governor who are active producers of Mississippi land, water or timber commodities. The Governor shall appoint one (1) such person from each Supreme Court district.

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority and the Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall serve as co-chairmen of the board.

The board shall meet at least once each calendar quarter at the call of the co-chairmen. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum at all meetings. An affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting is required in the adoption of any actions taken by the board. All members must be notified, in writing, of all regular and special meetings of the board, which notices must be mailed at least ten (10) days before the dates of the meetings. All meetings shall take place at the State Capitol in Jackson, Mississippi. The board shall provide a copy of the minutes of each of its meetings to the Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee and the Chairman of the House of Representatives Agriculture Committee.

Members of the board shall not receive compensation. However, each member may be paid travel expenses and meals and lodging expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, for such expenses incurred in furtherance of their duties. Travel expenses and meals and lodging expenses and other necessary expenses incurred by the board shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the Mississippi Development Authority.

In carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act, the board may utilize the services, facilities and personnel of all departments, agencies, offices and institutions of the state, and all such departments, agencies, offices and institutions shall cooperate with the board in carrying out the provisions of such act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 54, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 69-46-5.
Powers and duties of board.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

To develop marketing plans and opportunities for independent farmers in Mississippi;

To encourage the commercialization of new agricultural technology businesses;

To initiate the development of processing facilities for Mississippi agricultural commodities;

To initiate the development of Mississippi wholesale distribution businesses for agricultural inputs and products;

To promote the development of institutional and specialty markets for Mississippi agriculture products;

To encourage additional research for new agricultural product development;

To develop a working relationship with the state offices of the United States Department of Agriculture as may be appropriate for the promotion and development of agriculture in Mississippi;

To promote the rural quality of life in Mississippi through such programs as 4-H, Future Farmers of America and agricultural education;

To encourage, promote and initiate the development of alternative energy strategies, applied research technologies and commercialization enterprises that focus on Mississippi natural resources, including, but not limited to, agriculture, timber and poultry products and byproducts;

To file an annual report with the Governor, Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 1 of each year, with recommendations for any legislation necessary to accomplish the purposes of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act;

The board may promulgate and enforce rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act;

To expend funds out of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Fund to carry out its powers and duties under the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act;

The board may provide funds to public entities and private entities through loans, grants, contracts and any other manner the board determines appropriate for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 55; Laws, 2001, ch. 538, § 17; Laws, 2002, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 542, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 9, 2002.).

§ 69-46-7.
Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Fund; expenditures; authorization for borrowing in anticipation of bonds.

The Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Board may accept and expend funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature and funds from any other source in order to carry out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act. Such funds shall be deposited into a special fund hereby established in the State Treasury to be known as the “Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Fund.” Unexpended amounts derived from bond proceeds or private funds, or both, remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on such amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. All other unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall lapse into the State General Fund. The board may provide to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce not more than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), in the aggregate, of monies in the fund that are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 538, Laws of 2001, and/or Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 542, Laws of 2002, for the purpose of providing additional funds to defray costs incurred by the department in assisting the board in carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act. However, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce may not use any portion of such funds for the purpose of hiring any personas an employee as defined in Section 25-3-91(c). The Mississippi Department of Agriculture may escalate its budget and expend such funds, when provided by the board, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. The board may provide to the Mississippi Development Authority not more than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), in the aggregate, of monies in the fund that are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 538, Laws of 2001, and/or Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 542, Laws of 2002, for the purpose of providing additional funds to defray costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority in assisting the board in carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act. However, the Mississippi Development Authority may not use any portion of such funds for the purpose of hiring any person as an employee as defined in Section 25-3-91(c). The Mississippi Development Authority may escalate its budget and expend such funds, when provided by the board, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.

The Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Board may provide to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce not more than One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00), in the aggregate, of monies in the fund that a rederived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 505, Laws of 2003, and One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00), in the aggregate, of monies in the fund that are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 72 through 87 of Chapter 1 of Laws of 2004, Third Extraordinary Session, for the purpose of providing additional funds to defray costs incurred by the department in assisting the board in carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act. However, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce may not use any portion of such funds for the purpose of hiring any person as an employee as defined in Section 25-3-91(c). The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce may escalate its budget and expend such funds, when provided by the board, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.

The Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Board may provide to the Mississippi Development Authority not more than One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00), in the aggregate, of monies in the fund that are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 505, Laws of 2003, and One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00), in the aggregate, of monies in the fund that are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 72 through 87 of Chapter 1 of Laws of 2004, Third Extraordinary Session, for the purpose of providing additional funds to defray costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority in assisting the board in carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act. However, the Mississippi Development Authority may not use any portion of such funds for the purpose of hiring any person as an employee as defined in Section 25-3-91(c). The Mississippi Development Authority may escalate its budget and expend such funds, when provided by the board, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.

The Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Board may provide to the Department of Audit not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), in the aggregate, of monies in the fund that are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 505, Laws of 2003, and Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), in the aggregate, of monies in the fund that are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 72 through 87 of Chapter 1 of Laws of 2004, Third Extraordinary Session, for the purpose of providing additional funds to defray costs incurred by the department in assisting the board in carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act. However, the Department of Audit may not use any portion of such funds for the purpose of hiring any person as an employee as defined in Section 25-3-91(c). The Department of Audit may escalate its budget and expend such funds, when provided by the board, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.

The Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Board shall set aside One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) of the monies in the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Fund, that are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 505, Laws of 2003, for the purpose of providing funds to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce for use in making payments to ethanol producers under Section 69-51-5 during the State Fiscal Year beginning July 1, 2003, and ending June 30, 2004. Any monies set aside which are not used for such purposes during the fiscal year shall no longer be set aside for such purposes after the end of the fiscal year. In addition, if the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce determines during such fiscal year that no ethanol producer will be eligible for such payments during the fiscal year, the commissioner shall inform the board of his determination and the monies set aside shall no longer be set aside for such purposes. The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce may escalate its budget and expend funds, when provided by the board under this subsection (2), in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.

In anticipation of the issuance of bonds authorized for the purpose of providing funds for the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Fund, the State Bond Commission is authorized to negotiate and enter into any purchase, loan, credit or other agreement with any bank, trust company or other lending institution or to issue and sell interim notes for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Land, Water and Timber Resources Act. All borrowings made under this subsection (3) shall be evidenced by notes of the State of Mississippi, which shall be issued from time to time, for such amounts, in such form and in such denomination and subject to such terms and conditions of sale and issuance, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest not to exceed the maximum rate authorized for bonds in Section 75-17-101, and time of payment of interest as the State Bond Commission shall agree to in such agreement. Such notes shall constitute general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and shall be backed by the full faith and credit of the state. Such notes may also be issued for the purpose of refunding previously issued notes. No note shall mature more than three (3) years following the date of its issuance. The State Bond Commission is authorized to provide for the compensation of any purchaser of the notes by payment of a fixed fee or commission and for all other costs and expenses of issuance and service, including paying agent costs. Such costs and expenses may be paid from the proceeds of the notes. Borrowings made under the provisions of this subsection (3) shall not exceed the aggregate sum of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) outstanding at any one time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 56; Laws, 2002, ch. 542, § 18; Laws, 2003, ch. 505, § 17; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess., ch. 1, § 88, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004.).